src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON HIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:hive    # ;
            +V+Imp:hiv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:hiver   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hives   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hev     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hivde   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:heiv    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:hivd    # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:hevet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:hivende # ;
LEXICON HJELPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:hjelpe    # ;
          +V+Imp:hjelp     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:hjelper   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hjelpes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:hjalp     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:hjulpet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:hjelpende # ;
LEXICON HOGGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:hogge    # ;
            +V+Imp:hogg     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:hogger   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hogges   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:hogg     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hogde    # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:hogget   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:hogd     # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:hoggende # ;
LEXICON HOLDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:holde    # ;
          +V+Imp:hold     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:holder   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:holdes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:holdt    # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:holdt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:holdende # ;
LEXICON HUGGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:hugge    # ;
           +V+Imp:hugg     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:hugger   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hugges   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:hugg     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hugde    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hugget   # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:hugd     # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:hugget   # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:huggende # ;
LEXICON JAGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           :jage v13   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:jog  #     ;
LEXICON KLINGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:klinge    # ;
          +V+Imp:kling     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:klinger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klinges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:klang     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:klinget   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:klingende # ;
LEXICON KLIPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:klipe    # ;
            +V+Imp:klip     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:kliper   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klipes   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:klep     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:kleip    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:klipt    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:klepet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:klipende # ;
LEXICON KLIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:klive    # ;
            +V+Imp:kliv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:kliver   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klives   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:klev     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:kleiv    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:klevet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:klivende # ;
LEXICON XYPE  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = klype:kl
             +V+Inf:ype    # ;
             +V+Imp:yp     # ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:yper   # ;
    +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ypes   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:øp     # ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:øyp    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:aup    # ;
          +V+PrfPrc:øpet   # ;
          +V+PrsPrc:ypende # ;
LEXICON KLYVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:klyve    # ;
          +V+Imp:klyv     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:klyver   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klyves   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:klyv     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:klyv     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:klyvende # ;
LEXICON XEKKE  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = knekke, kvekke
          +V+Inf:ekke    # ;
          +V+Imp:ekk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ekker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ekkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:akk     # ;
+V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:ekket   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:ekt     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:ekkende # ;
LEXICON KNESTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:kneste    # ;
          +V+Imp:knest     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:knester   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knestes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:knast     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:knestet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:knestende # ;
LEXICON KNETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:knette    # ;
          +V+Imp:knett     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:knetter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knettes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:knatt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:knettet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:knettende # ;
LEXICON KNIPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:knipe    # ;
            +V+Imp:knip     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:kniper   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knipes   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:knep     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:kneip    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:knepet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:knipende # ;
LEXICON KOMME !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:komme    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:kommer   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:kom      # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:kommet   # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:kommende # ;
     +V+Imp:kom      # ;
LEXICON KUNNE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:kunne  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:kan    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:kunne  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:kunnet # ;
LEXICON LA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:la   # ;
     +V+Imp:la   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:lar  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:lot  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:latt # ;
LEXICON LE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:le   # ;
     +V+Imp:lo   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:ler  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:lo   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:ledd # ;
LEXICON LEGGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:legge    # ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:legges   # ;
          +V+Imp:legg     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:legger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:legges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:la       # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:lagt     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:leggende # ;
LEXICON LIGGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:ligge    # ;
          +V+Imp:ligg     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ligger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ligges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:lå       # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:ligget   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:liggende # ;
LEXICON LYDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:lyde    # ;
           +V+Imp:lyd     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:lyder   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lydes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:lød     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:lydde   # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:lydt    # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:lydd    # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:lydende # ;
LEXICON MÅTTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:måtte # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:må    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:måtte # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:måttet  # ;
LEXICON MØTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:øte  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:øter # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:øtte # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:øtt  # ;
LEXICON PIPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:pipe    # ;
            +V+Imp:pip     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:piper   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:pipes   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:pep     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:peip    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:pepet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:pipende # ;
LEXICON RIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:rive    # ;
            +V+Imp:riv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:river   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:rev     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:reiv    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:revet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:rivende # ;
LEXICON RYKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:ryke     # ;
            +V+Imp:ryk      # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:ryker    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:røk      # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:røyk     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:røket    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:røykende # ;
LEXICON SETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:sette    # ;
          +V+Imp:sett     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:setter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:settes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:satte    # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:satt     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:settende # ;
LEXICON SELGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:selge    # ;
          +V+Imp:selg     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:selger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:selges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:solgte   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:solgt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:selgende # ;
LEXICON SE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 +V+Inf:se     # ;
                 +V+Imp:se     # ;
             +V+Ind+Prs:ser    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ses    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass+Use/NG:sees   # ;
             +V+Ind+Prt:så     # ;
              +V+PrfPrc:sett   # ;
              +V+PrsPrc:seende # ;
LEXICON SIGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:sige    # ;
            +V+Imp:sig     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:siger   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:siges   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:seg     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:seig    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:seget   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:sigd    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:sigende # ;
LEXICON SITTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:sitte    # ;
          +V+Imp:sitt     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:sitter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sittes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:satt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sittet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:sittende # ;
