src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
adlyde:ad LYDE ;
anholde:an HOLDE ;
ankomme:an KOMME ; !!≈ * @CODE@  
anlegge:an LEGGE ;
anse:an SE ;
ansette:an SETTE ;
avhjelpe:av HJELPE ;
avholde:av HOLDE ;
avlegge:av LEGGE ;
avrive:av RIVE ;
avse:av SE ;
avsette:av SETTE ;
avstedkomme:avsted KOMME ;
beholde:be HOLDE ;
bekomme:be KOMME ;
belegge:be LEGGE ;
bese:be SE ;
besette:be SETTE ;
besitte:be SITTE ;
beslaglegge:beslag LEGGE ;
bibeholde:bibe HOLDE ;
bilegge:bi LEGGE ;
bisette:bi SETTE ;
blottlegge:blott LEGGE ;
bløtlegge:bløt LEGGE ;
bortsette:bort SETTE ;
bosette:bo SETTE ;
botlegge:bot LEGGE ;
brakklegge:brakk LEGGE ;
brolegge:bro LEGGE ;
brulegge:bru LEGGE ;
busette:bu SETTE ;
båndlegge:bånd LEGGE ;
bøtelegge:bøte LEGGE ;
etterkomme:etter KOMME ;
etterse:etter SE ;
fargelegge:farge LEGGE ;
fastholde:fast HOLDE ;
fastlegge:fast LEGGE ;
fastsette:fast SETTE ;
forbeholde:forbe HOLDE ;
foreholde:fore HOLDE ;
forekomme:fore KOMME ;
forelegge:fore LEGGE ;
foreligge:fore LIGGE ;
forholde:for HOLDE ;
forlegge:for LEGGE ;
forse:for SE ;
fortsette:fort SETTE ;
forutse:forut SE ;
forutsette:forut SETTE ;
framholde:fram HOLDE ;
framkomme:fram KOMME ;
framlegge:fram LEGGE ;
framsette:fram SETTE ;
fremholde:frem HOLDE ;
fremkomme:frem KOMME ;
fremlegge:frem LEGGE ;
fremsette:frem SETTE ;
gjenbosette:gjenbo SETTE ;
gjeninnsette:gjeninn SETTE ;
gjense:gjen SE ;
gravlegge:grav LEGGE ;
grunnlegge:grunn LEGGE ;
halshogge:hals HOGGE ;
halshugge:hals HUGGE ;
hauglegge:haug LEGGE ;
helligholde:hellig HOLDE ;
hemmeligholde:hemmelig HOLDE ;
henholde:hen HOLDE ;
henlegge:hen LEGGE ;
hive: HIVE ;
hjelpe: HJELPE ;
hogge: HOGGE ;
holde: HOLDE ;
hugge: HUGGE ;
huglegge:hug LEGGE ;
hånle:hån LE ;
igangsette:igang SETTE ;
ihukomme:ihu KOMME ;
ilandsette:iland SETTE ;
ilegge:i LEGGE ;
imøtekomme:imøte KOMME ;
imøtese:imøte SE ;
inneholde:inne HOLDE ;
innlegge:inn LEGGE ;
innse:inn SE ;
innsette:inn SETTE ;
irettesette:irette SETTE ;
iscenesette:iscene SETTE ;
istandsette:istand SETTE ;
iverksette:iverk SETTE ;
jage: JAGE ;
kartlegge:kart LEGGE ;
klarlegge:klar LEGGE ;
klinge: KLINGE ;
klipe: KLIPE ;
klive: KLIVE ;
klukkle:klukk LE ;
klype:kl XYPE ;
klyve: KLYVE ;
knekke:kn XEKKE ;
knesette:kne SETTE ;
kneste: KNESTE ;
knette: KNETTE ;
knipe: KNIPE ;
komme: KOMME ;
kringsette:kring SETTE ;
krype:kr XYPE ;
kunne: KUNNE ;
kvekke:kv XEKKE ;
la: LA ;
landsette:land SETTE ;
le: LE ;
legge: LEGGE ;
ligge: LIGGE ;
lyde: LYDE ;
misligholde:mislig HOLDE ;
motsette:mot SETTE ;
måtte: MÅTTE ;
mørklegge:mørk LEGGE ;
møte:m MØTE ;
nedkomme:ned KOMME ;
nedlegge:ned LEGGE ;
nedsette:ned SETTE ;
omkomme:om KOMME ;
omsette:om SETTE ;
omstøte:omst MØTE ;
oppholde:opp HOLDE ;
opprettholde:opprett HOLDE ;
ordlegge:ord LEGGE ;
overholde:over HOLDE ;
overkomme:over KOMME ; 
overse:over SE ;
oversette:over SETTE ;
maskinoversette:maskinover SETTE ;
pantsette:pant SETTE ;
pipe: PIPE ;
planlegge:plan LEGGE ;
postlegge:post LEGGE ;
prissette:pris SETTE ;
pålegge:på LEGGE ;
påligge:på LIGGE ;
påsette:på SETTE ;
rimbelegge:rimbe LEGGE ;
rive: RIVE ;
ryke: RYKE ;
sammenholde:sammen HOLDE ;
se: SE ;
selge: SELGE ;
sette: SETTE ;
sige: SIGE ;
sitte: SITTE ;
sjøsette:sjø SETTE ;
skattelegge:skatte LEGGE ;
skattlegge:skatt LEGGE ; 
skoggerle:skogger LE ;
skrattle:skratt LE ;
skrinlegge:skrin LEGGE ;
skyldsette:skyld SETTE ;
småsitte:små SITTE ;
steinsette:stein SETTE ;
storle:stor LE ;
sysselsette:syssel SETTE ;
tilbakeholde:tilbake HOLDE ;
tilbakelegge:tilbake LEGGE ;
tilgodese:tilgode SE ;
tilkomme:til KOMME ;
tillegge:til LEGGE ;
tilligge:til LIGGE ;
tilrettelegge:tilrette LEGGE ;
tilrive:til RIVE ;
tilsette:til SETTE ;
tilsidesette:tilside SETTE ;
tilstøte:tilst MØTE ;
tviholde:tvi HOLDE ;
tørrlegge:tørr LEGGE ;
underholde:under HOLDE ;
underlegge:under LEGGE ;
unnse:unn SE ;
utholde:ut HOLDE ;
utkomme:ut KOMME ;
utse:ut SE ;
utsette:ut SETTE ;
vedkomme:ved KOMME ;
vedlegge:ved LEGGE ;
vedlikeholde:vedlike HOLDE ;
vektlegge:vekt LEGGE ; 
verdsette:verd SETTE ;
videreselge:videre SELGE ;
ødelegge:øde LEGGE ;
øydelegge:øyde LEGGE ;
